Utah statutes.
19-5-124.   Phosphorus limit for household dishwashing detergent.

(1)  As used in this section, "household dishwashing detergent" means a substance used:

(a)  to clean an item commonly used for preparing food, eating, or drinking; and

(b)  by an individual for a personal, family, or household purpose.

(2)  Except as provided by Subsection (3), a person may not sell a household dishwashing detergent that contains 0.5% or more phosphorus by weight on or after July 1, 2010.

(3)  This section does not apply to a dishwashing detergent designed and used for a commercial or industrial purpose.

